Louisiana, session 2026, HB1065.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.2(C)(2)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 15:574.2(C)(4), 574.4(L), and 574.4.1(F) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§574.2. Committee on parole, Board of Pardons; membership; qualifications;
vacancies; compensation; domicile; venue; meetings; quorum; panels;
powers and duties; transfer of property to committee; representation of
applicants before the committee; prohibitions
* * *
C.
* * *
(2) Except as provided in Paragraph Paragraphs (3) and (4) of this
Subsection, three votes of a three-member panel shall be are required to grant parole
or, if the number of members of the panel exceeds three, a unanimous vote of those
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2668 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1065
present shall be is required to grant parole and only if all of the following conditions
are met:
* * *
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary in this
Section, a majority of a three-member panel is required to grant parole or, if the
number of members of the panel exceeds three, a majority vote of those present is
required to grant parole for a person serving a sentence that was imposed pursuant
to a non-unanimous jury verdict.
* * *
§574.4. Parole; eligibility; juvenile offenders
* * *
L. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an offender serving
a sentence that was imposed pursuant to a non-unanimous jury verdict shall
immediately be eligible for parole consideration.
§574.4.1. Parole consideration and hearings
* * *
F.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the committee
shall consider or reconsider the application for parole of any prisoner who is serving
a sentence that was imposed pursuant to a non-unanimous jury verdict.
(2) If the prisoner is not granted parole, the prisoner shall be notified in
writing of the reason for the denial and may file a new application to the board no
earlier than one year from the date of action by the board. Any subsequent
applications shall not be filed earlier than one year after the immediately preceding
action taken by the board.
Section 2. Beginning August 1, 2026, the committee on parole shall consider or
reconsider applications for parole for sentences described in R.S. 15:574.4.1(F)(1), as
enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2668 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1065